Tennessee, session 114, HB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 23, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
- 2 - 002632

An attorney who, while acting in the capacity of counsel for a client or identifiable
prospective client, engages in conduct that would constitute any of the following offenses
is not immune from prosecution:
(1) Perjury, as defined in § 39-16-702;
(2) Aggravated perjury, as defined in § 39-16-703;
(3) Subornation of perjury, as defined in § 39-16-705;
(4) Tampering with or fabricating evidence, as defined in § 39-16-503;
(5) Destruction of or tampering with governmental records, as defined in
§ 39-16-504; or
(6) Coercion or persuasion of a witness, as defined in § 39-16-507.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 002632